District of Columbia statutes.
33-107.03

Repealed

Dissociated partner’s liability to other persons.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 703, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-157.3.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 703 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).